spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.dic
újságárus/AUKykSYcD
összezagyválódhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
összehangzás/AUKykSYcD
öntudatos/AUKykSYcDADFUKS
óvatos/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
ívnagyság/AUKykSYcD
élőjószág/AUKykSYcD
átírhatatlanság/AUKkSYcD
áthallás/AUKkSYcD
árultatás/AUKkSYcXD
árhullám/AUKkSYcD
ámuldozás/AUKkSYcXD
állástalanság/AUKkSYc
állampolgár/AUKykSYcD
ágyéktájiság/AUKkSYc
Újkigyós/AUKS
zúzatás/AUKkSYcXD
zálogosíthatóság/AUKkSYcXD
zsírosodás/AUKkSYcXD
zsinóroztatás/AUKkSYcXD
zománcozás/AUKkSYcXD
zaklatás/AUKkSYcXD
zablázhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
véznaság/AUKkSYc
végrehajtatás/AUKkSYcXD
ványolódtatás/AUKkSYcXD
válogathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
vágyhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
vontatottság/AUKkSYc
vizsgázás/AUKkSYcXD
visítás/AUKkSYcXD
visszaírhatatlanság/AUKkSYcD
virágoztathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
világfájdalmas/ADFUKS
vijjoghatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
vicsoríthatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
vernyákoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
vastagodás/AUKkSYcXDAUKkSYcD
variogram/AUKkSYcD
vaksiság/AUKkSYc
vagonírozhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
vacakoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
utilizálhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
unás/AUKkSYcXD
ukáz/AUKkSYcD
udvarias/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
túlkoros/ADFUKS
tótosodás/AUKkSYcXD
tébolyogás/AUKkSYcXD
társulat/AUKkSYcD
táplálás/AUKkSYcXD
támadhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
tutajoztatás/AUKkSYcXD
tumultuózus/ADFUKS
tudakoztatás/AUKkSYcXD
tromfoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
transzponálás/AUKkSYcXDAUKkSYcD
továbbíttatás/AUKkSYcXD
torokfájás/AUKykSYcD
tombolás/AUKkSYcXD
toldozgatás/AUKkSYcD
tizedrangúság/AUKkSYc
tisztátlanság/AUKkSYc
tilolhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
testamentum/AUKkSYcD
tempírozhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
tavaszias/ADFUKS
tartogathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
taposottság/AUKkSYc
tapaszoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
tanulmányozhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
taligázhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
tagozódás/AUKkSYcXDAUKkSYcD
súlyozhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
sítalpazhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
sárgásság/AUKkSYc
szövetelhalás/AUKykSYcD
szónokias/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
szívatás/AUKkSYcXD
szépszámúság/AUKkSYc
szárnyalhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
számítódtatás/AUKkSYcXD
szállítás/AUKkSYcXD
szádaltatás/AUKkSYcXD
szurdoshatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
szubarktikusság/AUKkSYc
szorzat/AUKkSYcD
szomszédosság/AUKkSYc
szokatlanság/AUKkSYc
szitáltatás/AUKkSYcXD
szinkronizáltatás/AUKkSYcXD
szilánkolás/AUKkSYcXD
szidathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
szenátoriság/AUKkSYc
szekírozhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
szavatolhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
szappanos/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
szalaszthatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
szakadék/AUKkSYcD
szabálytalanság/AUKkSYc
szabadcsapat/AUKkSYcD
sulykoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
stósz/AUKkSYcD
stimulálás/AUKkSYcXD
srác/AUKkSYcD
specifikus/YADFUKS
sorolás/AUKkSYcXD
sokalltatás/AUKkSYcXD
skorbutos/ADFUKS
simítózhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
sikoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
satíroztatás/AUKkSYcXD
sarabolhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
sajnálás/AUKkSYcXD
rónaság/AUKkSYcD
ráspolyozás/AUKkSYcXD
rámolhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
rábizonyítás/AUKkSYcD
rudalhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
rothadás/AUKkSYcXD
rongálhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
rokkanás/AUKkSYcXD
rizsporoztatás/AUKkSYcXD
ringathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
rezonátor/AUKkSYcD
restituálhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
rendreutasíttatás/AUKkSYcXD
reklámozhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
recitálás/AUKkSYcXD
rapliztatás/AUKkSYcXD
rajtolás/AUKkSYcXD
raffoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
pózoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
példányszám/AUKykSYcD
pároztathatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
pántozhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
pusztítottság/AUKkSYc
pulzálás/AUKkSYcXD
puffantathatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
prédálhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
prolongálódhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
procedurálisság/AUKkSYc
preferáltatás/AUKkSYcXD
potty/AUKkSYcD
portalaníthatóság/AUKkSYcXD
popularizálás/AUKkSYcXD
politikum/AUKkSYcD
poharazhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
plántálás/AUKkSYcXD
piázhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
pirosultatás/AUKkSYcXD
pikáns/ADFUKS
peroráltatás/AUKkSYcXD
pelenkázás/AUKkSYcXD
pattanásosság/AUKkSYc
passzírozás/AUKkSYcXD
parolázás/AUKkSYcXDAUKkSYcD
parancsolgathatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
papizás/AUKkSYcXD
palántáztatás/AUKkSYcXD
pajkosság/AUKkSYc
otthonias/ADFUKS
oszcillátor/AUKkSYcD
ország/AUKkSYcD
ordíttatás/AUKkSYcXD
ontathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
oltóág/AUKykSYcD
olajozhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
okadatoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
nőgyógyászat/AUKykSYcD
nádazás/AUKkSYcXD
nyárspolgáriság/AUKkSYc
nyugtalaníthatóság/AUKkSYcXD
nyomottságság/AUKkSYc
nyomakodás/AUKkSYcXD
nyilváníthatóság/AUKkSYcXD
nyavalyáskodás/AUKkSYcXD
nyakas/ADFUKS
normatívum/AUKkSYcD
nenyúljhozzám/AUKkSYcD
narkotikusság/AUKkSYc
nagyságolás/AUKkSYcXD
nagyasszony/AUKkSYcD
mórikáltatás/AUKkSYcXD
méltóztattatás/AUKkSYcXD
másoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
mángolhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
mutattatás/AUKkSYcXD
multilaterális/ADFUKS
motyoghatóság/AUKkSYcXD
mosdathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
morcoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
molyrágtaság/AUKkSYc
mocskosság/AUKkSYc
ministráltatás/AUKkSYcXD
mezőgazdaságiság/AUKkSYc
melózás/AUKkSYcXD
megvonalaztatás/AUKkSYcXD
megszidás/AUKkSYcD
megmásíthatatlanság/AUKkSYc
megháláltság/AUKkSYc
megerőszakolás/AUKkSYcD
megbirkózás/AUKkSYcD
maximalitás/AUKkSYcD
masinálhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
mardoshatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
malátázás/AUKkSYcXDAUKkSYcD
majorálhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
magvaszakadtság/AUKkSYc
madzagolhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
lóbáztatás/AUKkSYcXD
légkondicionálás/AUKykSYcD
látogatás/AUKkSYcXD
lábolás/AUKkSYcXD
lugas/AUKkSYcD
lopkodhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
locspocs/AUKkSYcD
limitálhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
leválasztás/AUKkSYcD
lesiklás/AUKkSYcD
lelkiállapot/AUKkSYcD
leheletvékony/ADFUKS
lecsúszottság/AUKkSYc
lazsnakolás/AUKkSYcXD
lapoztatás/AUKkSYcXD
lalláztatás/AUKkSYcXD
laikusság/AUKkSYc
kúposíttatás/AUKkSYcXD
körülvágás/AUKykSYcD
kótyagosság/AUKkSYc
kétségbevonóság/AUKkSYc
kár/AUKkSYcD
kuruttyolás/AUKkSYcXD
kukoricáztatás/AUKkSYcXD
kovászolhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
korszak/AUKykSYcD
korcoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
konvertálhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
konformistaság/AUKkSYc
kompatibilitás/AUKkSYcD
koitáltatás/AUKkSYcXD
klasszság/AUKkSYc
kiszivárgás/AUKkSYcD
kimarás/AUKkSYcD
kidomborodtatás/AUKkSYcXD
kegyúriság/AUKkSYc
karthauziság/AUKkSYc
kappanoztatás/AUKkSYcXD
kancsalság/AUKkSYc
kakecoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
jóllakathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
jogászkodás/AUKkSYcXD
izzasztathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
iszapoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
iparosíttatás/AUKkSYcXD
inspiráltatás/AUKkSYcXD
indokolás/AUKkSYcXD
imbolygóság/AUKkSYc
időváltozás/AUKykSYcD
hőingás/AUKkSYcD
házastársiság/AUKkSYc
hámlasztathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
hunyatás/AUKkSYcXD
hosszacskaság/AUKkSYc
homályos/ADFUKS
historikusság/AUKkSYc
hervadoztatás/AUKkSYcXD
haverkodtatás/AUKkSYcXD
hasznos/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
harangcsillag/AUKkSYcD
hamisítvány/AUKkSYcD
halasztathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
hajhászhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
gúnyoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
gyönyörittasság/AUKkSYc
gyermekkor/AUKykSYcD
gurguláztatás/AUKkSYcXD
gondolatgazdagság/AUKykSYcDAUKykSYc
gennyfolyásos/AUKykSYcD
galaktikus/AUKkSYcD
fölbizsuzhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
fásíttatás/AUKkSYcXD
furfangosság/AUKkSYc
fragmentum/AUKkSYcD
formalizálhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
folytonos/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
foglyászás/AUKkSYcXD
flagráns/ADFUKS
figurázás/AUKkSYcXD
feltartóztatottság/AUKkSYcD
feldolgozás/AUKkSYcD
farizeus/AUKkSYcD
fakaszthatóság/AUKkSYcXD
expiálás/AUKkSYcXD
erőszakoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
előgyújtás/AUKykSYcD
elszipkázás/AUKkSYcXD
ellátottság/AUKkSYc
elhagyottság/AUKkSYc
elbarmoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
egyensúly/AUKkSYcD
dánság/AUKkSYc
dugdosgattatás/AUKkSYcXD
domborítottság/AUKkSYc
divatosság/AUKkSYc
differenciálódtatás/AUKkSYcXD
deszkázás/AUKkSYcXD
delfinárium/AUKkSYcD
datálódhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
célozgathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
csókállóság/AUKkSYc
csurgattatás/AUKkSYcXD
csomópontiság/AUKkSYc
csikorgás/AUKkSYcDAUKSXY
csattantathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
csacsoghatóság/AUKkSYcXD
cigányozás/AUKkSYcXD
búvárolhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
béníthatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
bágyaszthatóság/AUKkSYcXD
bujdosás/AUKkSYcXD
boszorkányság/AUKkSYcD
borjazás/AUKkSYcXD
bolondíttatás/AUKkSYcXD
blablázás/AUKkSYcXD
binom/AUKkSYcD
beszartság/AUKkSYcD
belepistultság/AUKkSYc
bedolgozás/AUKkSYcXDAUKkSYcD
banális/ADFUKS
babonásság/AUKkSYc
asztmatikus/ADFUKS
arctalanság/AUKkSYc
apadás/AUKkSYcXD
angoltapasz/AUKykSYcD
alvás/AUKkSYcXDAUKkSYcD
alkirályság/AUKkSYcD
alacsonyítás/AUKkSYcXDAUKkSYcD
akaratos/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
agglomerátum/AUKkSYcD
acélosodás/AUKkSYcXD
Vércsorog/AUKS
Tóváros/AUKS
Taksony/AUKS
Szentkirály/AUKS
Rudály/AUKS
Poklós/AUKS
Ocs/AUKS
Nagykutas/AUKS
Mikolcsány/AUKS
Linux/AUKkSYcDAUKS
Komorócszobránc/AUKS
Kerkakutas/AUKS
Hásság/AUKS
Hajmás/AUKS
Füzérkomlós/AUKS
Felsődrskóc/AUKS
Dolány/AUKS
Csallköznádas/AUKS
Bolkács/AUKS
Bagos/AUKS
Alsóaklos/AUKS
